Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-143
Adoptive parent; notice of nonconsent; filing.

For adoptions in which the relinquishment or consent for adoption was given prior to July 20, 2002: An adoptive parent or parents may at any time, if they desire, file a notice of nonconsent with the department stating that at no time prior to his or her death or the death of both parents if each signed the form may any information on the adopted person's original birth certificate be released to such adopted person. The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons subject to the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 25;

Laws 1985, LB 255, § 30;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 40;

Laws 2002, LB 952, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 88.

Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, see section 43-1501.